Missouri, session 2026, HB3055.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 195.070, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 195.070, to read as follows:
195.070. 1. A physician, podiatrist, dentist, a registered optometrist certified to
administer pharmaceutical agents as provided in section 336.220, or an assistant physician in
accordance with section 334.037 or a physician assistant in accordance with section 334.747
in good faith and in the course of his or her professional practice only, may prescribe,
administer, and dispense controlled substances or he or she may cause the same to be
administered or dispensed by an individual as authorized by statute.
2. An advanced practice registered nurse, as defined in section 335.016, but not a
certified registered nurse anesthetist as defined in subdivision (8) of section 335.016, who
holds a certificate of controlled substance prescriptive authority from the board of nursing
under section 335.019 and who is delegated the authority to prescribe controlled substances
under a collaborative practice arrangement under section 334.104 may prescribe any
controlled substances listed in Schedules III, IV, and V of section 195.017, and may have
restricted authority in Schedule II. Prescriptions for Schedule II medications prescribed by an
advanced practice registered nurse who has a certificate of controlled substance prescriptive
authority are restricted to only those medications containing hydrocodone and Schedule II
controlled substances for hospice patients pursuant to the provisions of section 334.104.
However, no such certified advanced practice registered nurse shall prescribe controlled
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3055 2
substance for his or her own self or family. Schedule III narcotic controlled substance and
Schedule II - hydrocodone prescriptions shall be limited to a one hundred twenty-hour supply
without refill.
3. A veterinarian, in good faith and in the course of the veterinarian's professional
practice only, and not for use by a human being, may prescribe, administer, and dispense
controlled substances and the veterinarian may cause them to be administered by an assistant
or orderly under his or her direction and supervision.
4. A practitioner shall not accept any portion of a controlled substance unused by a
patient, for any reason, if such practitioner did not originally dispense the drug, except:
(1) When the controlled substance is delivered to the practitioner to administer to the
patient for whom the medication is prescribed as authorized by federal law. Practitioners
shall maintain records and secure the medication as required by this chapter and regulations
promulgated pursuant to this chapter; or
(2) As provided in section 195.265.
5. An individual practitioner shall not prescribe or dispense a controlled substance for
such practitioner's personal use except in a medical emergency.
6. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary:
(1) No physician licensed under chapter 334 shall delegate the authority to order
ketamine hydrochloride for mental health purposes under the physician's registration
with the federal Drug Enforcement Administration and the state bureau of narcotics
and dangerous drugs to any other individual;
(2) Any physician licensed under chapter 334 who delegates the administration
of ketamine hydrochloride for mental health purposes to a certified registered nurse
anesthetist shall be on site and immediately available to supervise and respond to
patient needs during such administration; and
(3) Intravenous ketamine hydrochloride treatment for mental health purposes
shall not be administered without a documented diagnosis and treatment plan from a
physician licensed under chapter 334.
✔